Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1803
Issuance of annuity; how construed.

Issuance of a charitable gift annuity does not constitute:

(1) Engaging in business as a trust company subject to the Nebraska Trust Company Act;

(2) Engaging in the business of insurance subject to Chapter 44;

(3) Engaging in an act in violation of sections 59-801 to 59-831;

(4) Engaging in an act in violation of the Viatical Settlements Act; or

(5) Engaging in an act in violation of the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act. Conduct other than issuance of a charitable gift annuity, including the marketing of a charitable gift annuity, is not exempt from application of the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act pursuant to this subdivision.

Laws 1996, LB 972, § 3;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 98;

Laws 2001, LB 52, § 57;

Laws 2002, LB 1278, § 34.

Nebraska Trust Company Act, see section 8-201.01.

Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act, see section 87-306.

Viatical Settlements Act, see section 44-1101.